Washington statutes.
RCW 31.35.100

Notice—Investments not insured.

All agricultural lenders shall notify their members at the time of membership and annually thereafter that their investment in the agricultural lender, although regulated by the director, is not insured, guaranteed, or protected by any federal or state agency.

[ 1994 c 92 s 259; 1990 c 134 s 10.]